Mississippi, session 2026, HB4155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Derrick Dujmov of Harrison County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Grand Larceny in Harrison County, and was sentenced on June 18, 2012, to serve two (2) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released on parole on August 27, 2013, and discharged from probation on August 14, 2014.  Previously, he was sentenced on September 8, 2011, on the charge of Possession of a Controlled Substance and sentenced to three (3) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections for each count. On October 1, 2018, for two (2) counts of Delivery of a Controlled Substance, he was sentenced to serve two (2) years and six (6) months in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections with three (3) years to serve under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections for each count. He was released to parole on June 10, 2019.  He was discharged from probation on February 5, 2022.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.